Delaware, session 153, SB146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 41, Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 4150. Type 1 diabetes informational material. (a) The Department of Health and Social Services, in consultation with the Department of Education, shall post existing appropriate informational materials on type 1 diabetes on the Department of Health and Social Services' website. Each school district shall make the informational materials available to the parents or guardians of students enrolled in their districts. (b) The informational materials shall include all of the following: (1) A description of type 1 diabetes. (2) A description of the risk factors and warning signs associated with type 1 diabetes. (3) A recommendation that the parents or guardians of a student displaying warning signs of type 1 diabetes consult with the studentâs primary care provider to determine if immediate screening for type 1 diabetes is appropriate. (4) A description of the screening process for type 1 diabetes and the implications of test results. (5) A recommendation that, following a type 1 diagnosis, parents or guardians should consult with the studentâs primary care provider to develop an appropriate treatment plan, which may include consultation with and examination by a qualified specialist, such as an endocrinologist. Section 2. If this Act is enacted before or on August 1, 2025, this Act takes effect on August 1 of the first full year following its enactment into law. If this Act is enacted after August 1, 2025, this Act takes effect on August 1 following its enactment into law.